Massachusetts, session 194th, S1158.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The Massachusetts General Laws are hereby amended by inserting the
following new chapter:
An Act to Enhance State Anti-Trust Powers and Enforcement.
1.) Sound, and honest economic, and business behavior, benefit the economy of the
Commonwealth, its businesses, organizations, and the individual consumers of Massachusetts.
Therefore, this Statute sets standards, requiring, urging, and providing for the more robust usage,
and enforcement of anti-trust powers, presently held by all of the legal authorities of
Massachusetts, including the Constitutional Officers, and the Judicial Authorities.
2.) While Federal Anti-Trust powers are important, and valuable, for various reasons, the
various authorities of The United States, from time to time, lack the resources, or have other
of 2

more important focuses, regarding various business activities, and problems. When this is true,
and even under normal circumstances, situations present themselves, in the view of state
authorities, that can, and/or should, be monitored, and acted upon by the Commonwealth.
3.) In doing so, the sound, and honest economy, and benefit to consumers of
Massachusetts, can be improved.
4.) Therefore, this legislation provides that the Attorney General of Massachusetts, make
public formal recommendations, in an annual Economic Enforcement Report, as to what
measures relating to anti-trust, need revitalization, streamlined regulation, and consumer-friendly
enforcement in terms of sound business practices in our Commonwealth.
5.) Particular attention in this Annual Report, shall be given to monitoring, and
enforcement relating to large so-called chain stores, across all fields, for their maintenance of
honest pricing, and sales promotion processes.
6.) Sound regulation of business practices, shall also be reviewed, by this Annual Report;
with particular attention to the ability of small, and medium-sized businesses, being able to
compete fairly, and honestly, in successful ways.
of 2